North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-09.17 Biodiesel Partnership in Assisting Community Expansion [Renumbered]

[Redesignated as chapter 17-03 under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5]

Note.

This chapter has been redesignated as chapter 17-03 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

6-09.17-01.
Definitions.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as
section 17-03-01 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

6-09.17-02.
Biofuel partnership in assisting community expansion fund — Continuing appropriation — Administration.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as
section 17-03-02 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

6-09.17-03.
Fund — Purpose — Interest rate buydown.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as
section 17-03-03 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

6-09.17-04.
Fund moneys — Eligible uses.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as
section 17-03-04 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

6-09.17-05.
Partnership in assisting community expansion fund incentive limitation.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.]

Note.

This section, as enacted by section 25 of chapter ch. 14, S.L. 2007, has been redesignated as
section 17-03-05 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.